Arkansas, session 2025, HB1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas Court of Appeals for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q017N CHIEF STAFF ATTORNEY 1 GRADE EXE02
(2) Q033C LAW CLERK 24 GRADE SPC07
(3) Q013C STAFF ATTORNEY 3 GRADE SPC07
(4) Q034C CHIEF DEPUTY CLERK 1 GRADE SPC05
(5) Q087C DEPUTY COURT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SPC05
(6) Q112C JUDICIAL ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 12 GRADE SGS09
*JAR014*
04-07-2025 14:45:11 JAR014

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1086
(7) Q098C ASSISTANT CHIEF DEPUTY CLERK 1 GRADE SGS08
(8) Q099C FINANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE SGS09
(9) Q100C RECORDS MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS07
(10) Q119C DEPUTY CLERK 3 GRADE SGS07
(11) Q111C JUDICIAL ADMIN ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 49

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Court of Appeals for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Court of Appeals, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, special judges,
court appointed attorneys, and other legal expenses of the Arkansas Court of
Appeals for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,329,643
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,384,511
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 276,129
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 80,900
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) LEGAL COUNSEL 360,000
(06) SPECIAL JUDGES 17,044
(07) MILEAGE REIMBURSEMENT 60,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,583,227
04-07-2025 14:45:11 JAR014

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1086

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee



04-07-2025 14:45:11 JAR014